Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.140

Auditor or charter county financial officer—Ex officio deputy state auditor.

Each county auditor or financial officer designated in a charter county shall be ex officio deputy of the state auditor for the purpose of accounting and reporting on municipal corporations and in such capacity shall be under the direction of the state auditor, but he or she shall receive no additional salary or compensation by virtue thereof and shall perform no duties as such, except in connection with county business.

[ 2006 c 280 s 1; 1995 c 301 s 61; 1963 c 4 s 36.22.140. Prior: 1909 c 76 s 12; RRS s 9962.]